Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-416
Lifetime permits; stamps, required.

Lifetime hunting, fishing, or combination hunting and fishing permits shall not allow fur harvesting, the hunting of elk, mountain sheep, deer, antelope, or wild turkey, or other hunting or fishing done under authority of any special permit. The holder of a lifetime permit is required to purchase habitat stamps, aquatic habitat stamps, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps pursuant to section 37-426.

Laws 1983, LB 173, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-202.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 126;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 5.